Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1120
Application; contents.

Each application to engage in chemigation shall contain (1) the name and post office address of the applicant, (2) the location by legal description of the land where chemigation is to be used, and (3) such other information as the department, after consultation with the district, may deem necessary.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 20.